test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-e_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - alge:
    alge+N+Sg+Nom: alge
    alge+N+Sg+Gen: alge
    alge+N+Sg+Acc: alge
    alge+N+Sg+Ill: aalgan
    alge+N+Sg+Loc: algeest
    alge+N+Sg+Com: olgijn
    alge+N+Sg+Abe: algettáá
    alge+N+Ess: algen
    alge+N+Par: alged
    alge+N+Pl+Nom: algeh
    alge+N+Pl+Gen: [oolgij, olgij]
    alge+N+Pl+Acc: oolgijd
    alge+N+Pl+Ill: olgijd
    alge+N+Pl+Loc: oolgijn
    alge+N+Pl+Com: olgijguin
    alge+N+Pl+Abe: olgijttáá
  
  
  Noun - saje:
    saje+N+Sg+Nom: saje
    saje+N+Sg+Gen: saje
    saje+N+Sg+Acc: saje
    saje+N+Sg+Ill: sajan
    saje+N+Sg+Loc: saajeest
    saje+N+Sg+Com: soijijn # Matti Morottajain tärhistum
    saje+N+Sg+Abe: sajettáá
    saje+N+Ess: saijeen
    saje+N+Par: saijeed
    saje+N+Pl+Nom: sajeh
    saje+N+Pl+Gen: [soojij, sojij]
    saje+N+Pl+Acc: soojijd
    saje+N+Pl+Ill: [soojijd, soijijd] # MM: j säänist máhđulávt
    saje+N+Pl+Loc: soojijn
    saje+N+Pl+Com: sojijguin
    saje+N+Pl+Abe: sojijttáá

    
  Noun - mane:
    mane+N+Sg+Nom: mane
    mane+N+Sg+Gen: mane
    mane+N+Sg+Acc: mane
    mane+N+Sg+Ill: manan
    mane+N+Sg+Loc: maaneest
    mane+N+Sg+Com: moonijn # MM
    mane+N+Sg+Abe: manettáá
    mane+N+Ess: manneen
    mane+N+Par: manneed
    mane+N+Pl+Nom: maneh
    mane+N+Pl+Gen: [moonij, monij]
    mane+N+Pl+Acc: moonijd
    mane+N+Pl+Ill: moonijd # MM
    mane+N+Pl+Loc: moonijn
    mane+N+Pl+Com: monijguin
    mane+N+Pl+Abe: monijttáá

  Noun - iše:
    iše+N+Sg+Nom: iše
    iše+N+Sg+Gen: iše
    iše+N+Sg+Acc: iše
    iše+N+Sg+Ill: išán
    iše+N+Sg+Loc: iššeest
    iše+N+Sg+Com: iššijn # MM
    iše+N+Sg+Abe: išettáá
    iše+N+Ess: iššeen
    iše+N+Par: iššeed
    iše+N+Pl+Nom: išeh
    iše+N+Pl+Gen: [iišij, išij]
    iše+N+Pl+Acc: iišijd
    iše+N+Pl+Ill: [iišijd, iššijd] # MM
    iše+N+Pl+Loc: iišijn
    iše+N+Pl+Com: išijguin
    iše+N+Pl+Abe: išijttáá

  Noun - kove:
    kove+N+Sg+Nom: kove # Matti Morottaja & ILWB IV
    kove+N+Sg+Gen: kove
    kove+N+Sg+Acc: kove
    kove+N+Sg+Ill: kován
    kove+N+Sg+Loc: kooveest
    kove+N+Sg+Com: [kuvvijn, kuuvijn] # MM & MLO kuvvijn; ILWB IV kuuvijn
    kove+N+Sg+Abe: kovettáá
    kove+N+Ess: kovveen
    kove+N+Par: kovveed
    kove+N+Pl+Nom: koveh
    kove+N+Pl+Gen: [kuuvij, kuvij]
    kove+N+Pl+Acc: kuuvijd
    kove+N+Pl+Ill: kuuvijd # MM, MLO & ILWB; MM iäpádâs - ill. kuhheeb om Vuoli Ilmarist
    kove+N+Pl+Loc: kuuvijn
    kove+N+Pl+Com: kuvijguin
    kove+N+Pl+Abe: kuvijttáá

  Noun - njune:
    njune+N+Sg+Nom: njune
    njune+N+Sg+Gen: njune
    njune+N+Sg+Acc: njune
    njune+N+Sg+Ill: njunán
    njune+N+Sg+Loc: njuuneest
    njune+N+Sg+Com: [njuunijn, njunnijn] # MM + MLO
    njune+N+Sg+Abe: njunettáá
    njune+N+Ess: njunneen
    njune+N+Par: njunneed
    njune+N+Pl+Nom: njuneh
    njune+N+Pl+Gen: [njuunij, njunij]
    njune+N+Pl+Acc: njuunijd
    njune+N+Pl+Ill: njuunijd
    njune+N+Pl+Loc: njuunijn
    njune+N+Pl+Com: njunijguin
    njune+N+Pl+Abe: njunijttáá

  Noun - hadde:
    hadde+N+Sg+Nom: hadde
    hadde+N+Sg+Gen: hade
    hadde+N+Sg+Acc: hade
    hadde+N+Sg+Ill: haadan
    hadde+N+Sg+Loc: haddeest
    hadde+N+Sg+Com: hoddijn
    hadde+N+Sg+Abe: hadettáá
    hadde+N+Ess: hadden
    hadde+N+Par: hadded
    hadde+N+Pl+Nom: hadeh
    hadde+N+Pl+Gen: [hoodij, hodij]
    hadde+N+Pl+Acc: hoodijd
    hadde+N+Pl+Ill: [hoodijd, hoddijd]
    hadde+N+Pl+Loc: hoodijn
    hadde+N+Pl+Com: hodijguin
    hadde+N+Pl+Abe: hodijttáás

  Noun - sappe:
    sappe+N+Sg+Nom: sappe
    sappe+N+Sg+Gen: sape
    sappe+N+Sg+Acc: sape
    sappe+N+Sg+Ill: saapan
    sappe+N+Sg+Loc: sappeest
    sappe+N+Sg+Com: soppijn
    sappe+N+Sg+Abe: sapettáá
    sappe+N+Ess: sappen
    sappe+N+Par: sapped
    sappe+N+Pl+Nom: sapeh
    sappe+N+Pl+Gen: [soopij, sopij]
    sappe+N+Pl+Acc: soopijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Ill: soppijd
    sappe+N+Pl+Loc: soopijn
    sappe+N+Pl+Com: sopijguin
    sappe+N+Pl+Abe: sopijttáá

  Noun - litte:
    litte+N+Sg+Nom: litte
    litte+N+Sg+Gen: lite
    litte+N+Sg+Acc: lite
    litte+N+Sg+Ill: liitán
    litte+N+Sg+Loc: litteest
    litte+N+Sg+Com: littijn
    litte+N+Sg+Abe: litettáá
    litte+N+Ess: litten
    litte+N+Pl+Nom: liteh
    litte+N+Pl+Gen: [liitij, litij]
    litte+N+Pl+Acc: liitijd
    litte+N+Pl+Ill: littijd
    litte+N+Pl+Loc: liitijn
    litte+N+Pl+Com: litijguin
    litte+N+Pl+Abe: litijttáá

  Noun - lodde:
    lodde+N+Sg+Nom: lodde
    lodde+N+Sg+Gen: lode
    lodde+N+Sg+Acc: lode
    lodde+N+Sg+Ill: loodán
    lodde+N+Sg+Loc: loddeest
    lodde+N+Sg+Com: luddijn
    lodde+N+Sg+Abe: lodettáá
    lodde+N+Ess: lodden
    lodde+N+Par: lodded
    lodde+N+Pl+Nom: lodeh
    lodde+N+Pl+Gen: [luudij, ludij]
    lodde+N+Pl+Acc: luudijd
    lodde+N+Pl+Ill: [luudijd, luddijd]
    lodde+N+Pl+Loc: luudijn
    lodde+N+Pl+Com: ludijguin
    lodde+N+Pl+Abe: ludijttáá

  Noun - lanne:
    lanne+N+Sg+Nom: lanne
    lanne+N+Sg+Gen: lane
    lanne+N+Sg+Acc: lane
    lanne+N+Sg+Ill: laanan
    lanne+N+Sg+Loc: lanneest
    lanne+N+Sg+Com: lonnijn
    lanne+N+Sg+Abe: lanettáá
    lanne+N+Ess: lannen
    lanne+N+Par: lanned
    lanne+N+Pl+Nom: laneh
    lanne+N+Pl+Gen: [loonij, lonij]
    lanne+N+Pl+Acc: loonijd
    lanne+N+Pl+Ill: [loonijd, lonnijd]
    lanne+N+Pl+Loc: loonijn
    lanne+N+Pl+Com: lonijguin
    lanne+N+Pl+Abe: lonijttáá

  Noun - ponne:
    ponne+N+Sg+Nom: ponne
    ponne+N+Sg+Gen: pone
    ponne+N+Sg+Acc: pone
    ponne+N+Sg+Ill: poonán
    ponne+N+Sg+Loc: ponneest
    ponne+N+Sg+Com: punnijn
    ponne+N+Sg+Abe: ponettáá
    ponne+N+Ess: ponnen
    ponne+N+Par: ponned
    ponne+N+Pl+Nom: poneh
    ponne+N+Pl+Gen: [puunij, punij]
    ponne+N+Pl+Acc: puunijd
    ponne+N+Pl+Ill: [puunijd, punnijd]
    ponne+N+Pl+Loc: puunijn
    ponne+N+Pl+Com: punijguin
    ponne+N+Pl+Abe: punijttáá

  Noun - runne:
    runne+N+Sg+Nom: runne
    runne+N+Sg+Gen: rune
    runne+N+Sg+Acc: rune
    runne+N+Sg+Ill: ruunán
    runne+N+Sg+Loc: runneest
    runne+N+Sg+Com: runnijn
    runne+N+Sg+Abe: runettáá
    runne+N+Ess: runnen
    runne+N+Par: punned
    runne+N+Pl+Nom: runeh
    runne+N+Pl+Gen: [ruunij, runij]
    runne+N+Pl+Acc: ruunijd
    runne+N+Pl+Ill: runnijd
    runne+N+Pl+Loc: ruunijn
    runne+N+Pl+Com: runijguin
    runne+N+Pl+Abe: runijttáá

  Noun - cumme:
    cumme+N+Sg+Nom: cumme
    cumme+N+Sg+Gen: cume
    cumme+N+Sg+Acc: cume
    cumme+N+Sg+Ill: cuumán
    cumme+N+Sg+Loc: cummeest
    cumme+N+Sg+Com: cummijn
    cumme+N+Sg+Abe: cumettáá
    cumme+N+Ess: cummen
    cumme+N+Par: cummed
    cumme+N+Pl+Nom: cumeh
    cumme+N+Pl+Gen: [cuumij, cumij]
    cumme+N+Pl+Acc: cuumijd
    cumme+N+Pl+Ill: [cuumijd, cummijd]
    cumme+N+Pl+Loc: cuumijn
    cumme+N+Pl+Com: cumijguin
    cumme+N+Pl+Abe: cumijttáá

  Noun - pille:
    pille+N+Sg+Nom: pille
    pille+N+Sg+Gen: pile
    pille+N+Sg+Acc: pile
    pille+N+Sg+Ill: piilán
    pille+N+Sg+Loc: pilleest
    pille+N+Sg+Com: pillijn
    pille+N+Sg+Abe: pilettáá
    pille+N+Ess: pillen
    pille+N+Par: pilled
    pille+N+Pl+Nom: pileh
    pille+N+Pl+Gen: [piilij, pilij]
    pille+N+Pl+Acc: piilijd
    pille+N+Pl+Ill: [piilijd, pillijd]
    pille+N+Pl+Loc: piilijn
    pille+N+Pl+Com: pilijguin
    pille+N+Pl+Abe: pilijttáá

  Noun - alme:
    alme+N+Sg+Nom: alme
    alme+N+Sg+Gen: alme
    alme+N+Sg+Acc: alme
    alme+N+Sg+Ill: aalman
    alme+N+Sg+Loc: almeest
    alme+N+Sg+Com: olmijn
    alme+N+Sg+Abe: almettáá
    alme+N+Ess: almen
    alme+N+Par: almed
    alme+N+Pl+Nom: almeh
    alme+N+Pl+Gen: [oolmij, olmij]
    alme+N+Pl+Acc: oolmijd
    alme+N+Pl+Ill: [oolmijd, olmijd]
    alme+N+Pl+Loc: oolmijn
    alme+N+Pl+Com: olmijguin
    alme+N+Pl+Abe: olmijttáá

  Noun - aske:
    aske+N+Sg+Nom: aske
    aske+N+Sg+Gen: aske
    aske+N+Sg+Acc: aske
    aske+N+Sg+Ill: aaskan
    aske+N+Sg+Loc: askeest
    aske+N+Sg+Com: oskijn
    aske+N+Sg+Abe: askettáá
    aske+N+Ess: asken
    aske+N+Par: asked
    aske+N+Pl+Nom: askeh
    aske+N+Pl+Gen: [ooskij, oskij]
    aske+N+Pl+Acc: ooskijd
    aske+N+Pl+Ill: oskijd
    aske+N+Pl+Loc: ooskijn
    aske+N+Pl+Com: oskijguin
    aske+N+Pl+Abe: oskijttáá

  Noun - pispe:
    pispe+N+Sg+Nom: pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Gen: pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Acc: pispe
    pispe+N+Sg+Ill: piispán
    pispe+N+Sg+Loc: pispeest
    pispe+N+Sg+Com: pispijn
    pispe+N+Sg+Abe: pispettáá
    pispe+N+Ess: pispen
    pispe+N+Par: pisped
    pispe+N+Pl+Nom: pispeh
    pispe+N+Pl+Gen: [piispij, pispij]
    pispe+N+Pl+Acc: piispijd
    pispe+N+Pl+Ill: pispijd
    pispe+N+Pl+Loc: piispijn
    pispe+N+Pl+Com: pispijguin
    pispe+N+Pl+Abe: pispijttáá

  Noun - nijbe:
    nijbe+N+Sg+Nom: nijbe
    nijbe+N+Sg+Gen: [niijbe, nijbe]
    nijbe+N+Sg+Acc: [niijbe, nijbe]
    nijbe+N+Sg+Ill: niijbán
    nijbe+N+Sg+Loc: nijbeest
    nijbe+N+Sg+Com: nijbijn
    nijbe+N+Sg+Abe: nijbettáá
    nijbe+N+Ess: nijben
    nijbe+N+Par: nijbed
    nijbe+N+Pl+Nom: nijbeh
    nijbe+N+Pl+Gen: [niijbij, nijbij]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Acc: niijbijd
    nijbe+N+Pl+Ill: [nijbijd, niijbijd]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Loc: niijbijn
    nijbe+N+Pl+Com: nijbijguin
    nijbe+N+Pl+Abe: nijbijttáá

  Noun - olbe:
    olbe+N+Sg+Nom: olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Gen: olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Acc: olbe
    olbe+N+Sg+Ill: oolbán
    olbe+N+Sg+Loc: olbeest
    olbe+N+Sg+Com: ulbijn
    olbe+N+Sg+Abe: olbettáá
    olbe+N+Ess: olben
    olbe+N+Par: olbed
    olbe+N+Pl+Nom: olbeh
    olbe+N+Pl+Gen: [uulbij, ulbij]
    olbe+N+Pl+Acc: uulbijd
    olbe+N+Pl+Ill: ulbijd
    olbe+N+Pl+Loc: uulbijn
    olbe+N+Pl+Com: ulbijguin
    olbe+N+Pl+Abe: ulbijttáá

  Noun - juhle:
    juhle+N+Sg+Nom: juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Gen: juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Acc: juhle
    juhle+N+Sg+Ill: juuhlán
    juhle+N+Sg+Loc: juhleest
    juhle+N+Sg+Com: juhlijn
    juhle+N+Sg+Abe: juhlettáá
    juhle+N+Ess: juhlen
    juhle+N+Par: juhled
    juhle+N+Pl+Nom: juhleh
    juhle+N+Pl+Gen: [juuhlij, juhlij]
    juhle+N+Pl+Acc: juuhlijd
    juhle+N+Pl+Ill: juhlijd
    juhle+N+Pl+Loc: juuhlijn
    juhle+N+Pl+Com: juhlijguin
    juhle+N+Pl+Abe: juhlijttáá

  Noun - nartte:
    nartte+N+Sg+Nom: nartte
    nartte+N+Sg+Gen: narte
    nartte+N+Sg+Acc: narte
    nartte+N+Sg+Ill: naartan
    nartte+N+Sg+Loc: nartteest
    nartte+N+Sg+Com: norttijn
    nartte+N+Sg+Abe: nartettáá
    nartte+N+Ess: nartten
    nartte+N+Par: nartted
    nartte+N+Pl+Nom: narteh
    nartte+N+Pl+Gen: [noortij, nortij]
    nartte+N+Pl+Acc: noortijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Ill: norttijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Loc: noortijn
    nartte+N+Pl+Com: nortijguin
    nartte+N+Pl+Abe: nortijttáá

  Noun - luŋkke:
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Nom: luŋkke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Gen: luŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Acc: luŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Ill: luuŋkán
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Loc: luŋkkeest
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Com: luŋkkijn
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Abe: luŋkettáá
    luŋkke+N+Ess: luŋkken    
    luŋkke+N+Par: luŋkked
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Nom: luŋkeh
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Gen: [luuŋkij, luŋkij]
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Acc: luuŋkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Ill: luŋkkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Loc: luuŋkijn
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Com: luŋkijguin
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Abe: luŋkijttáá

  Noun - puicce:
    puicce+N+Sg+Nom: puicce
    puicce+N+Sg+Gen: puice
    puicce+N+Sg+Acc: puice
    puicce+N+Sg+Ill: puuicán
    puicce+N+Sg+Loc: puicceest
    puicce+N+Sg+Com: puiccijn
    puicce+N+Sg+Abe: puicettáá
    puicce+N+Ess: puiccen
    puicce+N+Ess: puicced
    puicce+N+Pl+Nom: puiceh
    puicce+N+Pl+Gen: [puuicij, puicij]
    puicce+N+Pl+Acc: puuicijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Ill: puiccijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Loc: puuicijn
    puicce+N+Pl+Com: puicijguin
    puicce+N+Pl+Abe: puicijttáá

  Noun - ahe:
    ahe+N+Sg+Nom: ahe
    ahe+N+Sg+Gen: ave
    ahe+N+Sg+Acc: ave
    ahe+N+Sg+Ill: ahan
    ahe+N+Sg+Loc: avveest
    ahe+N+Sg+Com: ovvijn
    ahe+N+Sg+Abe: avettáá
    ahe+N+Ess: ahheen
    ahe+N+Par: aheed
    ahe+N+Pl+Nom: aveh
    ahe+N+Pl+Gen: [oovij, ovij]
    ahe+N+Pl+Acc: oovijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Ill: ovvijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Loc: oovijn
    ahe+N+Pl+Com: ovijguin
    ahe+N+Pl+Abe: ovijttáá
